Hawaii statutes.
§25-6 Cooperation. The commission may
request and shall receive from every department, division, board, bureau,
commission or other agency of the State cooperation and assistance in the
performance of its duties. [L 1969, c 79, §6]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next